Utah statutes.
61-2f-505.   Additional license fee.
(1)  An individual who applies for or renews a principal broker or associate
broker license shall pay, in addition to the application or renewal fee, a
reasonable annual fee of up to $18, as determined by the division with the
concurrence of the commission.
(2)  An individual who applies for or renews a sales agent license shall pay
in addition to the application or renewal fee a reasonable annual fee of up to
$12, as determined by the division with the concurrence of the commission.
(3)  Notwithstanding Section 13-1-2, the additional fees under this section
shall be paid into the fund.
